Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.040

Dates upon which boards in counties with populations of less than two hundred ten thousand deemed established.

For the purposes of this chapter, each county with a population of less than two hundred ten thousand shall be deemed to have established a boundary review board on and after the date a proposition for establishing the same has been approved at an election as provided for in RCW 36.93.030, or on and after the date of adoption of a resolution of the county legislative authority establishing the same as provided for in RCW 36.93.030.

[ 1991 c 363 s 92; 1967 c 189 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.